Maryland, session 2025, HB0208.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Commercial Law
13–301.
Unfair, abusive, or deceptive trade practices include any:
(14) Violation of a provision of:
(xlii) Section 12–6C–09.1 of the Health Occupations Article; [or]
(xliii) Title 14, Subtitle 48 of this article; or
(XLIV) SECTION 14–2904 OF THIS ARTICLE; OR
14–2901.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(b) “Advertise” means:
(1) To publish, circulate, disseminate, or place before the public in any way
or through any medium for the purpose of selling merchandise; and
(2) Advertising by:
(i) Exterior or interior signs, including neon or other electrical signs;
(ii) Radio, telephone, or television; and

HOUSE BILL 208 3
(iii) Newspaper, magazine, book, notice, or any other method or
material.
(C) “CLEAR AND CONSPICUOUS” MEANS IN A MANNER THAT CLEARLY
CALLS ATTENTION TO THE LANGUAGE, INCLUDING TEXT THAT IS:
(1) IN LARGER TYPE THAN THE SURROUNDING TEXT;
(2) IN A CONTRASTING TYPE, FONT, OR COLOR TO THE SURROUNDING
TEXT; OR
(3) SET OFF FROM THE SURROUNDING TEXT BY SYMBOLS OR OTHER
MARKS.
(D) “DIGITAL APPLICATION OR GAME” MEANS ANY APPLICATION OR GAME
THAT A PERSON ACCESSES AND MANIPULATES USING A SPECIALIZED ELECTRONIC
GAMING DEVICE, COMPUTER, MOBILE DEVICE, TABLET, OR OTHER DEVICE WITH A
DISPLAY SCREEN, INCLUDING ANY ADD–ONS OR ADDITIONAL CONTENT FOR THE
APPLICATION OR GAME.
(E) “DIGITAL AUDIO WORK” MEANS A WORK THAT RESULTS FROM THE
FIXATION OF A SERIES OF MUSICAL, SPOKEN, OR OTHER SOUNDS THAT ARE
TRANSFERRED ELECTRONICALLY, INCLUDING:
(1) PRERECORDED OR LIVE SONGS;
(2) MUSIC;
(3) READINGS OF BOOKS OR OTHER WRITTEN MATERIALS;
(4) SPEECHES;
(5) RINGTONES; OR
(6) OTHER SOUND RECORDINGS.
(F) (1) “DIGITAL AUDIOVISUAL WORK” MEANS A SERIES OF RELATED
IMAGES THAT, WHEN SHOWN IN SUCCESSION, IMPART AN IMPRESSION OF MOTION,
TOGETHER WITH ACCOMPANYING SOUNDS.
(2) “DIGITAL AUDIOVISUAL WORK” INCLUDES MOTION PICTURES,
MUSICALS, VIDEOS, NEWS AND ENTERTAINMENT PROGRAMS, AND LIVE EVENTS.

HOUSE BILL 208
(G) “DIGITAL BOOK” MEANS A WORK THAT IS GENERALLY RECOGNIZED AS
A BOOK AND IS TRANSFERRED ELECTRONICALLY, INCLUDING A WORK OF FICTION
OR NONFICTION.
(H) (1) “DIGITAL CODE” MEANS A CODE THAT GRANTS THE PERSON
HOLDING THE CODE A RIGHT TO OBTAIN AN ADDITIONAL DIGITAL GOOD THAT MAY
BE OBTAINED BY ANY MEANS, INCLUDING TANGIBLE FORMS AND ELECTRONIC MAIL,
REGARDLESS OF WHETHER THE CODE IS DESIGNATED AS A SONG CODE, VIDEO
CODE, OR BOOK CODE.
(2) “DIGITAL CODE” INCLUDES:
(I) A A CODE USED TO ACCESS OR OBTAIN ANY SPECIFIED
DIGITAL GOODS, OR ANY ADDITIONAL DIGITAL GOODS THAT HAVE BEEN
PREVIOUSLY PURCHASED; AND
(II) PROMOTION CARDS OR CODES THAT ARE PURCHASED BY A
RETAILER OR OTHER BUSINESS ENTITY FOR USE BY THE RETAILER’S OR ENTITY’S
CUSTOMERS.
(I) (1) “DIGITAL GOOD” MEANS A DIGITAL APPLICATION OR GAME,
DIGITAL AUDIO WORK, DIGITAL AUDIOVISUAL WORK, DIGITAL BOOK, OR DIGITAL
CODE, WHETHER ELECTRONICALLY OR DIGITALLY DELIVERED OR ACCESSED.
(2) “DIGITAL GOOD” DOES NOT INCLUDE A CABLE TELEVISION
SERVICE, SATELLITE RELAY TELEVISION SERVICE, OR ANY OTHER DISTRIBUTION OF
TELEVISION, VIDEO, OR RADIO SERVICE.
[(c)] (J) “Person” includes an association, firm, partnership, corporation, or an
agent or employee of any of these entities.
[(d)] (K) “Property”, as used in § 14–2902(a) through (c) of this subtitle, includes:
(1) Merchandise;
(2) Real estate;
(3) Securities;
(4) Employment;
(5) A loan made at interest;
(6) Any contract relating to real estate, securities, service, employment, or
the making of loans at interest; or

HOUSE BILL 208 5
(7) Anything else of value.
14–2904.
(A) A PERSON THAT IS A SELLER MAY NOT ADVERTISE OR OFFER FOR SALE
A DIGITAL GOOD USING TERMINOLOGY THAT A REASONABLE PERSON WOULD
UNDERSTAND TO CONFER AN UNRESTRICTED OWNERSHIP INTEREST IN THE
DIGITAL GOOD, UNLESS, AT THE TIME OF BEFORE EXECUTING THE SALE:
(1) THE SELLER RECEIVES AN AFFIRMATIVE ACKNOWLEDGMENT
FROM THE PURCHASER OF THE FOLLOWING:
(I) THAT THE PURCHASER IS RECEIVING A LICENSE TO ACCESS
A DIGITAL GOOD;
(II) A COMPLETE LIST OF RESTRICTIONS AND CONDITIONS OF
THE LICENSE; AND
(III) THAT ACCESS TO THE DIGITAL GOOD MAY BE
UNILATERALLY REVOKED BY THE SELLER IF THE PURCHASER NO LONGER HOLDS A
RIGHT TO THE DIGITAL GOOD; AND OR
(2) THE SELLER PROVIDES TO THE PURCHASER A CLEAR AND
CONSPICUOUS STATEMENT THAT:
(I) STATES IN PLAIN LANGUAGE THAT THE PURCHASER IS
BUYING A LICENSE FOR THE DIGITAL GOOD; AND
(II) INCLUDES A DIGITAL METHOD TO ACCESS THE LICENSE
DETAILS, TERMS, AND CONDITIONS.
(B) A PERSON MAY NOT ADVERTISE OR OFFER FOR SALE A DIGITAL GOOD
ALONGSIDE AN OPTION FOR A TIME–LIMITED RENTAL, UNLESS, AT THE TIME OF
SALE:
(1) THE SELLER RECEIVES AN AFFIRMATIVE ACKNOWLEDGMENT
FROM THE PURCHASER OF THE FOLLOWING:
(I) THAT THE PURCHASER IS RECEIVING A LICENSE TO ACCESS
A DIGITAL GOOD;
(II) A COMPLETE LIST OF RESTRICTIONS AND CONDITIONS OF
THE LICENSE; AND

HOUSE BILL 208
(III) THAT ACCESS TO THE DIGITAL GOOD MAY BE
UNILATERALLY REVOKED BY THE SELLER IF THE PURCHASER NO LONGER HOLDS A
RIGHT TO THE DIGITAL GOOD; AND
(2) THE SELLER PROVIDES TO THE PURCHASER A CLEAR AND
CONSPICUOUS STATEMENT THAT:
(I) STATES IN PLAIN LANGUAGE THAT THE PURCHASER IS
BUYING A LICENSE FOR THE DIGITAL GOOD; AND
(II) INCLUDES A DIGITAL METHOD TO ACCESS THE LICENSE
DETAILS, TERMS, AND CONDITIONS.
(C) (B) THE AFFIRMATIVE ACKNOWLEDGMENTS ACKNOWLEDGMENT
REQUIRED UNDER SUBSECTIONS SUBSECTION (A)(1) AND (B)(1) OF THIS SECTION
SHALL BE DISTINCT AND SEPARATE FROM ANY OTHER STATEMENT THAT THE
PURCHASER ACKNOWLEDGES.
(D) (C) THE CLEAR AND CONSPICUOUS STATEMENTS STATEMENT
REQUIRED UNDER SUBSECTIONS SUBSECTION (A)(2) AND (B)(2) OF THIS SECTION
SHALL BE DISTINCT AND SEPARATE FROM ANY OTHER STATEMENTS, DETAILS,
TERMS, OR CONDITIONS.
(E) (D) THIS SECTION DOES NOT:
(1) REQUIRE A PERSON TO DOWNLOAD A DIGITAL GOOD; OR
(2) PROHIBIT A PERSON FROM STORING A DIGITAL GOOD ON A
SERVER THAT CAN BE ACCESSED THROUGH THE INTERNET.
(F) (E) THIS SECTION DOES NOT APPLY TO A PERSON WHO ADVERTISES
OR OFFERS FOR SALE:
(1) A SUBSCRIPTION–BASED SERVICE THAT PROVIDES ACCESS TO A
DIGITAL GOOD ONLY FOR THE DURATION OF THE SUBSCRIPTION;
(2) ACCESS TO A DIGITAL GOOD WITHOUT THE REQUIREMENT FOR
MONETARY CONSIDERATION; OR
(3) A DIGITAL GOOD FOR WHICH THE SELLER IS UNABLE TO REVOKE
ACCESS AFTER COMPLETION OF THE SALE, INCLUDING A DIGITAL GOOD THAT IS, AT
THE TIME OF PURCHASE, AVAILABLE FOR PERMANENT OFFLINE DOWNLOAD TO AN

HOUSE BILL 208 7
EXTERNAL STORAGE SOURCE TO BE USED WITHOUT A CONNECTION TO THE
INTERNET.
(G) (F) A PERSON WHO VIOLATES THIS SECTION IS GUILTY OF A
MISDEMEANOR AND ON CONVICTION IS SUBJECT TO A FINE NOT EXCEEDING $1,000
VIOLATION OF THIS SECTION IS:
(1) AN UNFAIR, ABUSIVE, OR DECEPTIVE TRADE PRACTICE WITHIN
THE MEANING OF TITLE 13 OF THIS ARTICLE; AND
(2) SUBJECT TO THE ENFORCEMENT AND PENALTY PROVISIONS
CONTAINED IN TITLE 13 OF THIS ARTICLE, EXCEPT §§ 13–408 AND 13–411 OF THIS
ARTICLE OR IMPRISONMENT NOT EXCEEDING 1 YEAR OR BOTH.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.